Utah statutes.
31A-27a-609.   Claims of codebtor.

If a creditor does not timely file a proof of the creditor's claim, the following may file a proof of the claim:

(1)  a person who is liable to the creditor together with the insurer; or

(2)  a person who has secured the creditor.



Enacted by Chapter 309, 2007 General Session

